Washington statutes.
RCW 19.116.030

Application of consumer protection act.

Unlawful subleasing or unlawful transfer of an ownership interest in motor vehicles is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business. A violation of this chapter is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 2000 c 171 s 70; 1990 c 44 s 4.]